Washington statutes.
RCW 18.50.150

Midwifery advisory committee—Advice and recommendations.

The midwifery advisory committee shall advise and make recommendations to the secretary on issues including, but not limited to, continuing education, mandatory reexamination, and peer review.

[ 1998 c 245 s 6; 1991 c 3 s 115; 1981 c 53 s 4.]